Idaho, session 2025, S1098.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 12, Title 33, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 33-1203A, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
33-1203A. REGISTERED TEACHER APPRENTICESHIP PROGRAM. (1) For pur-
poses of this section:
(a) "Mentor teacher" means a licensed teacher in good standing with at
least three (3) years of licensed educator experience who supervises
and guides a teacher apprentice during the apprenticeship period. The
mentor teacher supports the training, mentoring, and progress of the
teacher apprentice.
(b) "Teacher apprentice" means an individual who is registered and
enrolled in the registered teacher apprenticeship program and works un-
der the supervision of the mentor teacher, learning through on-the-job
teaching experience and academic coursework. A teacher apprentice
shall not be the teacher of record in any public school while completing
the registered teacher apprenticeship program.
(2) The state board of education shall establish a registered teacher
apprenticeship program, subject to approval by the United States department
of labor, which shall provide an alternative structured educational pathway
for prospective teachers to obtain a bachelor's degree from an accredited
institution and licensure as a teacher through a combination of on-the-job
training and academic coursework.
(3) In consultation with the state department of education and other
relevant stakeholders, the state board of education shall establish eligi-
bility requirements and program guidelines in conformity with federal ap-
prenticeship standards under 29 CFR 29.5. Such guidelines shall include but
are not limited to:
(a) The teacher apprentice shall gain classroom experience through di-
rect teaching practice under the supervision of the mentor teacher.
(b) The mentor teacher shall assist the teacher apprentice with plan-
ning and teaching with a continuing gradual increase in teacher appren-
tice responsibility.


(c) The mentor teacher shall assist the teacher apprentice in becoming
an effective and competent teacher but shall not serve as an evaluator
of the teacher apprentice.
(d) A mentor teacher may receive compensation for the mentor teacher
services in addition to the educator's salary.
(4) Upon completion of the registered teacher apprenticeship program
pursuant to this section, a teacher apprentice shall receive a standard cer-
tificate and shall be eligible to receive a bachelor's degree from an accred-
ited institution and to obtain licensure as a teacher in the state of Idaho.
(5) The state board of education may promulgate rules, subject to leg-
islative approval, implementing the provisions of this section.
SECTION 2. That Section 33-1201, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
33-1201. CERTIFICATE REQUIRED. (1) Every person who is employed to
serve in any elementary or secondary school in the capacity of teacher,
supervisor, administrator, education specialist, school nurse, or school
librarian shall be required to have and to hold a certificate issued under
authority of the state board of education, valid for the service being ren-
dered; except that the state board of education may authorize endorsement
for use in Idaho, for not more than five (5) years, certificates valid in
other states when the qualifications therefor are not lower than those re-
quired for an Idaho certificate.
(2) No certificate shall be required of a student who is attending any
teacher-training institution and serving as a practice teacher or teacher
apprentice in a state board of education-approved registered apprenticeship
program for teachers in a classroom under the supervision of a certificated
teacher and who is jointly assigned by such teacher-training institution and
the governing board of a district or a public institution to perform practice
teaching or of a student who is participating in the registered teacher ap-
prenticeship program pursuant to section 33-1203A, Idaho Code.
(3) A student, while serving in a practicum, internship, apprentice-
ship, or student teaching position under the supervision of a person cer-
tificated pursuant to this section, shall be accorded the same liability in-
surance coverage by the school district being served as that accorded such
certificated person in the same district, and such student shall comply with
all rules and regulations of the school district or public institution while
serving in such a capacity.
SECTION 3. That Section 33-1203, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
33-1203. ACCREDITED TEACHER TRAINING REQUIREMENTS. Except in the
limited fields of trades and industries and specialists certificates of
school librarians and school nurses, the state board shall not authorize the
issuance of any standard certificate premised upon less than four (4) years
of accredited college training to any person who does not hold a bachelor's
degree from an accredited four (4) year institution, including such profes-
sional training as the state board may require, or the successful completion
of a state board of education-approved registered apprenticeship program


for teachers; but in emergencies, which must be declared, the state board may
authorize the issuance of provisional certificates based on not less than
two (2) years of college training.
SECTION 4. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.